North Carolina, session 2025, HB621.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Safe Alliance,
Inc., a nonprofit organization, for its Family Justice Center, known as the Umbrella Center, which
will provide additional services to those impacted by domestic violence, sexual assault, child
abuse, elder abuse, and human trafficking. These funds shall be used for additional land
acquisition and an added deceleration lane.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H621-v-1*